Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2442
Rules and regulations.

The department, upon the recommendation of the Board of Pharmacy, shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Immunosuppressant Drug Repository Program Act. Such rules and regulations shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) Eligibility criteria and other standards and procedures for participants that accept and distribute or dispense donated immunosuppressant drugs;

(2) Necessary forms for administration of the program, including, but not limited to, forms for use by persons or entities that donate, accept, distribute, or dispense immunosuppressant drugs under the program. The forms shall include the name of the person to whom the drug was originally prescribed; and

(3)(a) Categories of immunosuppressant drugs that may be donated or returned under the program and (b) categories of immunosuppressant drugs that cannot be donated or returned under the program and the reason that such drugs cannot be donated or returned.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 48.